Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-133
Board of Regents; eminent domain; procedure.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is hereby given power and authority to acquire by eminent domain lands necessary for the university. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1905, c. 158, § 1, p. 606;

R.S.1913, § 7117;

C.S.1922, § 6749;

C.S.1929, § 85-135;

R.S.1943, § 85-133;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 122, p. 504.